src/morphology/stems/numeral.lexc
LEXICON NUM_51kolmaskiljardis

+Ord+Pl+Abe:nsittakiljardinsitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Abl:nsiltakiljardinsilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ade:nsillakiljardinsilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+All:nsillekiljardinsille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Com:nsinekiljardinsine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ela:nsistakiljardinsista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ess:nsinakiljardinsina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Gen:nsienkiljardinsien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ill:nsiinkiljardinsiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ine:nsissakiljardinsissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ins:nsinkiljardinsin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Nom:nnetkiljardinnet  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Par:nsiakiljardinsia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Tra:nsiksikiljardinsiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abe:nnettakiljardinnetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abl:nneltakiljardinnelta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ade:nnellakiljardinnella  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+All:nnellekiljardinnelle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ela:nnestakiljardinnesta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ess:ntenakiljardina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Gen:nnenkiljardinnen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ill:nteenkiljardinteen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ine:nnessakiljardinnessa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Nom:skiljardis  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Par:ttakiljarditta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Tra:nneksikiljardinneksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51kolmaskiljoonas

+Ord+Pl+Abe:nsittakiljoonansitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Abl:nsiltakiljoonansilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ade:nsillakiljoonansilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+All:nsillekiljoonansille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Com:nsinekiljoonansine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ela:nsistakiljoonansista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ess:nsinakiljoonansina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Gen:nsienkiljoonansien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ill:nsiinkiljoonansiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ine:nsissakiljoonansissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ins:nsinkiljoonansin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Nom:nnetkiljoonannet  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Par:nsiakiljoonansia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Tra:nsiksikiljoonansiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abe:nnettakiljoonannetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abl:nneltakiljoonannelta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ade:nnellakiljoonannella  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+All:nnellekiljoonannelle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ela:nnestakiljoonannesta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ess:ntenakiljoonantena  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Gen:nnenkiljoonannen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ill:nteenkiljoonanteen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ine:nnessakiljoonannessa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Nom:skiljoonas  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Par:ttakiljoonatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Tra:nneksikiljoonanneksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51kolmaskolmatta

+Ord+Pl+Abe:nsittakolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Abl:nsiltakolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ade:nsillakolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+All:nsillekolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Com:nsinekolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ela:nsistakolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ess:nsinakolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Gen:nsienkolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ill:nsiinkolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ine:nsissakolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Nom:nnetkolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Par:nsiakolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Tra:nsiksikolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abe:nnettakolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abl:nneltakolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ade:nnellakolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+All:nnellekolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ela:nnestakolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ess:ntenakolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Gen:nnenkolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ill:nteenkolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ine:nnessakolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Nom:skolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Par:ttakolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Tra:nneksikolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51kolmaskuudetta

+Ord+Pl+Abe:nsittakuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Abl:nsiltakuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ade:nsillakuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+All:nsillekuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Com:nsinekuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ela:nsistakuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ess:nsinakuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Gen:nsienkuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ill:nsiinkuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ine:nsissakuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Nom:nnetkuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Par:nsiakuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Tra:nsiksikuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abe:nnettakuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abl:nneltakuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ade:nnellakuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+All:nnellekuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ela:nnestakuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ess:ntenakuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Gen:nnenkuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ill:nteenkuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ine:nnessakuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Nom:skuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Par:ttakuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Tra:nneksikuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51kolmaskvadriljardis

+Ord+Pl+Abe:nsittakvadriljardinsitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Abl:nsiltakvadriljardinsilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ade:nsillakvadriljardinsilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+All:nsillekvadriljardinsille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Com:nsinekvadriljardinsine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ela:nsistakvadriljardinsista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ess:nsinakvadriljardinsina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Gen:nsienkvadriljardinsien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ill:nsiinkvadriljardinsiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ine:nsissakvadriljardinsissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ins:nsinkvadriljardinsin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Nom:nnetkvadriljardinnet  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Par:nsiakvadriljardinsia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Tra:nsiksikvadriljardinsiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abe:nnettakvadriljardinnetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abl:nneltakvadriljardinnelta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ade:nnellakvadriljardinnella  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+All:nnellekvadriljardinnelle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ela:nnestakvadriljardinnesta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ess:ntenakvadriljardina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Gen:nnenkvadriljardinnen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ill:nteenkvadriljardinteen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ine:nnessakvadriljardinnessa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Nom:skvadriljardis  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Par:ttakvadriljarditta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Tra:nneksikvadriljardinneksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

LEXICON NUMERAL
kolmaskiljardis+Num:kolma  NUM_51kolmaskiljardis  ;
kolmaskiljoonas+Num:kolma  NUM_51kolmaskiljoonas  ;
kolmaskolmatta+Num:kolma  NUM_51kolmaskolmatta  ;
kolmaskuudetta+Num:kolma  NUM_51kolmaskuudetta  ;
kolmaskvadriljardis+Num:kolma  NUM_51kolmaskvadriljardis  ;
